Washington statutes.
RCW 16.38.010

Declaration of purpose.

The production of livestock is one of the largest industries in this state; and whereas livestock disease constitutes a constant threat to the public health and the production of livestock in this state; and whereas the prevention and control of such livestock diseases by the state may be best carried on by the establishment of a diagnostic service program for livestock diseases; therefore it is in the public interest and for the purpose of protecting health and general welfare that a livestock diagnostic service program be established.

[ 1969 c 100 s 1.]